Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1262
Role of county attorney or Attorney General.

(a) In a case arising under the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act or involving the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction, a county attorney or the Attorney General may take any lawful action, including resort to a proceeding under sections 43-1248 to 43-1264 or any other available civil proceeding, to locate a child, obtain the return of a child, or enforce a child custody determination if there is:

(1) an existing child custody determination;

(2) a request to do so from a court in a pending child custody proceeding;

(3) a reasonable belief that a criminal statute has been violated; or

(4) a reasonable belief that the child has been wrongfully removed or retained in violation of the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction.

(b) A county attorney or the Attorney General acting under this section acts on behalf of the court and may not represent any party.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 37.